Utah statutes.
53-2-109.    General duties of the Search and Rescue Advisory Board.

The duties of the Search and Rescue Advisory Board shall include:

(1)  conducting a board meeting at least once per quarter;

(2)  receiving applications for reimbursement of eligible expenses from county search and rescue operations by the end of the first quarter of each calendar year;

(3)  determining the reimbursement to be provided from the Search and Rescue Financial Assistance Program to each applicant;

(4)  standardizing the format and maintaining key search and rescue statistical data from each county within the state; and

(5)  disbursing funds accrued in the Search and Rescue Financial Assistance Program, created under Section 53-2-107, to eligible applicants until the program money is depleted in that fiscal year.

